Arkansas, session 2025, HB1970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-512(a), concerning the prepayment of
sales tax by certain retailers, is amended to read as follows:
(a) All retailers within the State of Arkansas registered to collect
the Arkansas gross receipts tax who, on July 1, have average net sales of
more than two five hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) ($500,000) per month
for the preceding fiscal year that began on July 1 and ended on June 30
shall, beginning the following January 1, make prepayment of sales tax by
electronic funds transfer, as defined in § 26-19-101, according to one (1) of
the following payment options:
(1)(A) The taxpayer may elect to make two (2) tax payments by
electronic funds transfer for each calendar month. Each payment shall be
equal to forty percent (40%) of the tax due on the monthly average net sales
on or before the twelfth and twenty-fourth of that month.
(B) The balance of actual collections for the month shall
*JLL383*
04/01/2025 7:18:28 PM JLL383

HB1970
be remitted with the monthly gross receipts tax report due by the twentieth
day of the following month; or
(2)(A) The taxpayer may elect to pay by electronic funds
transfer an amount equal to or exceeding eighty percent (80%) of the gross
receipts tax liability for each calendar month on or before the twenty-fourth
of that month.
(B) The balance of actual collections for the month shall
be remitted with the monthly gross receipts tax report due by the twentieth
day of the following month.



























04/01/2025 7:18:28 PM JLL383